Nebraska, session 109, LB640.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 47-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-502 Any person sentenced to or confined in a city or county jail,
including any person serving a custodial sanction imposed in response to a
parole or probation violation, shall, after the fifteenth day of his or her
confinement, have the aggregate of his or her remaining term, including the sum
of all consecutive sentences the person receives, whether received at the same
time or at any time during such sentence or confinement, reduced one day for
each day of his or her sentence or sanction during which he or she has not
committed any breach of discipline or other violation of jail regulations.
Sec. 2. Original section 47-502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
-1-